Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Office of General Services

§ 7-1-451.
Department of Finance and Administration to be Office of General Services.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall be the Office of General Services and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Office of General Services. Wherever the term “Office of General Services” appears in any law the same shall mean the Department of Finance and Administration. The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may assign to the appropriate divisions such powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the department’s lawful functions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-1-453.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§7-1-453. [En Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 6]